Maine, session 132, LD756.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §13062, 2nd ¶, as enacted by PL 1987, c. 534, Pt. A, §§17 and
19, is amended to read:
The Office of Business Development shall be is responsible for the implementation of
a program consisting of 3 4 primary elements.
Sec. 2. 5 MRSA §13062, sub-§4 is enacted to read:
4. Encouragement of employee ownership of businesses; Maine Employee
Ownership Center. The office shall contract with a nonprofit economic development
organization with relevant expertise to develop and manage an office, to be known as the
Maine Employee Ownership Center, that shall:
A. Develop educational programs, including convening an annual conference on
employee ownership issues;
B. Provide information about employee ownership and technical assistance to retiring
business owners, employees of plants threatened with closure and entrepreneurs
interested in creating businesses with broadly shared ownership;
C. Connect Maine businesses interested in implementing employee ownership to
available financial, technical and legal resources;
D. Assist firms and employee groups in performing preliminary feasibility studies to
determine the initial feasibility of employee ownership and whether the business and
employee group should perform a full feasibility study;
E. Help businesses interested in implementing some form of employee ownership to
obtain financing;
F. Promote best practices for operating employee-owned businesses;
G. Recommend legislative or executive action to promote employee ownership; and
H. Work with the Office of Program Evaluation and Government Accountability to
define the scope of data collection and to collect data and other information to facilitate
tax expenditure review under Title 3, chapter 37, including, but not limited to:
(1) The number of business ownership conversions to employee or cooperative
ownership;
(2) The number of full-time equivalent jobs retained as a result of conversions to
employee or cooperative ownership; and
(3) Data and information regarding other measures of the fiscal impact and overall
economic development in the State as the result of conversions to employee or
cooperative ownership.
Sec. 3. 36 MRSA §5122, sub-§2, ¶AAA is enacted to read:
AAA. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, to the extent included
in federal adjusted gross income and to the extent otherwise subject to Maine income
tax, an amount equal to any gain recognized on the sale by the taxpayer of an ownership
interest greater than 50% in a qualified business if the business was transferred to:
(1) An employee stock ownership plan as defined in the Code, Section 4975(e)(7);
Page 1 - 132LR1667(01)

(2) An S corporation organized in the State owned by an employee stock
ownership plan;
(3) An eligible worker-owned cooperative as defined in the Code, Section
1042(c)(2);
(4) A consumer cooperative organized under Title 13, chapter 85, subchapter 1;
or
(5) A producer cooperative organized under Title 13, chapter 85, subchapter 2.
The deduction allowed pursuant to this paragraph may not exceed $750,000.
For purposes of this paragraph, "qualified business" means a business whose securities
are not publicly traded on any stock exchange, including a corporation, an S
corporation, a limited liability company, a limited liability partnership, a sole
proprietorship and all entities that are not publicly traded and are related by common
majority ownership or control, and that is registered with the Secretary of State or
whose principal place of business is within the State.
Sec. 4. 36 MRSA §5122, sub-§2, ¶BBB is enacted to read:
BBB. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, to the extent included
in federal adjusted gross income and to the extent otherwise subject to Maine income
tax, an amount equal to the interest received during the taxable year by the taxpayer
with respect to a qualified business acquisition loan. For purposes of this paragraph:
(1) "Qualified business" means a business whose securities are not publicly traded
on any stock exchange, including a corporation, an S corporation, a limited liability
company, a limited liability partnership, a sole proprietorship and all entities that
are not publicly traded and are related by common majority ownership or control,
and that is registered with the Secretary of State or whose principal place of
business is within the State; and
(2) "Qualified business acquisition loan," including a loan or part of a series of
loans, means:
(a) A loan of which at least 90% of the proceeds are applied to the acquisition
of majority equity ownership of a qualified business not owned by an entity
under subdivisions (i) to (v) and that is given to:
(i) An employee stock ownership plan as defined in the Code, Section
4975(e)(7);
(ii) An S corporation organized in the State owned by an employee stock
ownership plan;
(iii) An eligible worker-owned cooperative as defined in the Code, Section
1042(c)(2);
(iv) A consumer cooperative organized under Title 13, chapter 85,
subchapter 1; or
(v) A producer cooperative organized under Title 13, chapter 85,
subchapter 2;
Page 2 - 132LR1667(01)

(b) A loan to a corporation that sponsors an employee stock ownership plan if
all proceeds of the loan are loaned to the employee stock ownership plan to
acquire for the plan all outstanding employer securities in a qualified business
and the plan's repayment terms are substantially similar to the corporation's
repayment terms; or
(c) A loan used to refinance a qualified business acquisition loan.
Sec. 5. 36 MRSA §5200-A, sub-§2, ¶JJ is enacted to read:
JJ. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, to the extent included in
federal taxable income and to the extent otherwise subject to Maine income tax, an
amount equal to any gain recognized on the sale by the taxpayer of an ownership
interest greater than 50% in a qualified business if the business was transferred to:
(1) An employee stock ownership plan as defined in the Code, Section 4975(e)(7);
(2) An S corporation organized in the State owned by an employee stock
ownership plan;
(3) An eligible worker-owned cooperative as defined in the Code, Section
1042(c)(2);
(4) A consumer cooperative organized under Title 13, chapter 85, subchapter 1;
or
(5) A producer cooperative organized under Title 13, chapter 85, subchapter 2.
The deduction allowed pursuant to this paragraph may not exceed $750,000.
For purposes of this paragraph, "qualified business" means a business whose securities
are not publicly traded on any stock exchange, including a corporation, an S
corporation, a limited liability company, a limited liability partnership, a sole
proprietorship and all entities that are not publicly traded and are related by common
majority ownership or control, and that is registered with the Secretary of State or
whose principal place of business is within the State.
Sec. 6. 36 MRSA §5200-A, sub-§2, ¶KK is enacted to read:
KK. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, to the extent included in
federal taxable income and to the extent otherwise subject to Maine income tax, an
amount equal to the interest received during the taxable year by the taxpayer with
respect to a qualified business acquisition loan. For purposes of this paragraph:
(1) "Qualified business" means a business whose securities are not publicly traded
on any stock exchange, including a corporation, an S corporation, a limited liability
company, a limited liability partnership, a sole proprietorship and all entities that
are not publicly traded and are related by common majority ownership or control,
and that is registered with the Secretary of State or whose principal place of
business is within the State; and
(2) "Qualified business acquisition loan," including a loan or part of a series of
loans, means:
Page 3 - 132LR1667(01)

(a) A loan of which at least 90% of the proceeds are applied to the acquisition
of majority equity ownership of a qualified business not owned by an entity
under subdivisions (i) to (v) and that is given to:
(i) An employee stock ownership plan as defined in the Code, Section
4975(e)(7);
(ii) An S corporation organized in the State owned by an employee stock
ownership plan;
(iii) An eligible worker-owned cooperative as defined in the Code, Section
1042(c)(2);
(iv) A consumer cooperative organized under Title 13, chapter 85,
subchapter 1; or
(v) A producer cooperative organized under Title 13, chapter 85,
subchapter 2;
(b) A loan to a corporation that sponsors an employee stock ownership plan if
all proceeds of the loan are loaned to the employee stock ownership plan to
acquire for the plan all outstanding employer securities in a qualified business
and the plan's repayment terms are substantially similar to the corporation's
repayment terms; or
(c) A loan used to refinance a qualified business acquisition loan.
Sec. 7. 36 MRSA §5206, as amended by PL 2019, c. 607, Pt. C, §4, is further
amended by enacting at the end a new paragraph to read:
For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, a financial institution subject
to tax under this section may for the purposes of the tax under this section subtract from
Maine net income an amount equal to the interest received during the taxable year by the
financial institution with respect to a qualified business acquisition loan.
Sec. 8. 36 MRSA §5206-D, sub-§13, as amended by PL 1999, c. 414, §43 and
affected by §57, is further amended to read:
13. Maine net income. "Maine net income" means, for any taxable year, a financial
institution's net income or loss per books required to be reported pursuant to the laws of the
United States on Internal Revenue Service Form 1120, 1120S, 1065 or any other Internal
Revenue Service form used to report net income or loss per books or, in the case of an
entity with a single owner that may be disregarded as an entity separate from its owner
pursuant to Internal Revenue Service regulations, the financial institution's net income or
loss per books determined as if the entity were required to file Internal Revenue Service
Form 1065, adjusted in accordance with section 5206, and apportioned to this State under
section 5206‑E. In the case of a financial institution that is a qualified subchapter S
subsidiary as defined by the Code, Section 1361, the financial institution's "Maine net
income" means a financial institution's net income or loss per books determined as if the
entity were required to file Internal Revenue Service Form 1120S and apportioned to this
State under section 5206‑E.
To the extent that a financial institution derives income from a unitary business carried on
by 2 or more members of an affiliated group, "Maine net income" is determined by
Page 4 - 132LR1667(01)

413 apportioning, in accordance with section 5206‑E, that part of the net income of the entire
424 group that derives from the unitary business.
Sec. 9. 36 MRSA §5206-D, sub-§16-A is enacted to read:
16-A. Qualified business. "Qualified business" means a business whose securities
are not publicly traded on any stock exchange, including a corporation, an S corporation, a
limited liability company, a limited liability partnership, a sole proprietorship and all
entities that are not publicly traded and are related by common majority ownership or
control, and that is registered with the Secretary of State or whose principal place of
business is within the State.
Sec. 10. 36 MRSA §5206-D, sub-§16-B is enacted to read:
16-B. Qualified business acquisition loan. "Qualified business acquisition loan,"
including a loan or part of a series of loans, means:
A. A loan of which at least 90% of the proceeds are applied to the acquisition of
majority equity ownership of a qualified business not owned by an entity under
subparagraphs (1) to (5) and that is given to:
(1) An employee stock ownership plan as defined in the Code, Section 4975(e)(7);
(2) An S corporation organized in the State owned by an employee stock
ownership plan;
(3) An eligible worker-owned cooperative as defined in the Code, Section
1042(c)(2);
(4) A consumer cooperative organized under Title 13, chapter 85, subchapter 1;
or
(5) A producer cooperative organized under Title 13, chapter 85, subchapter 2;
B. A loan to a corporation that sponsors an employee stock ownership plan if all
proceeds of the loan are loaned to the employee stock ownership plan to acquire for
the plan all outstanding employer securities in a qualified business and the plan's
repayment terms are substantially similar to the corporation's repayment terms; or
C. A loan used to refinance a qualified business acquisition loan.
Sec. 11. Evaluation; specific public policy objective; performance
measures. The deductions provided under this Act are subject to ongoing legislative
review in accordance with the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 3, chapter 37. The Office of
Program Evaluation and Government Accountability shall include review of deductions
provided under this Act in its regular schedule of tax expenditure reviews. In developing
evaluation parameters to perform the evaluation, the Office of Program Evaluation and
Government Accountability, the Government Oversight Committee and the joint standing
committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over taxation matters shall consider:
1. Policy objective. That the specific public policy objective of the deductions
provided under this Act is to retain jobs in qualifying businesses that would otherwise cease
operations by reducing the tax impact to business owners from qualifying sales of
ownership interests in order to encourage conversion of businesses to employee and
cooperative ownership and thereby allow the businesses to continue operations and retain
jobs; and
Page 5 - 132LR1667(01)

2. Performance measures. Performance measures, including, but not limited to:
A. The number of qualifying business ownership conversions to employee or
cooperative ownership;
B. The number of full-time equivalent jobs retained; and
C. Measures of fiscal impact and overall economic impact to the State.